South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 1, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-1-488.  (A) The State Department of Education shall review and approve all internet websites, computer applications, and other computer software proposed for use on school-issued digital devices to ensure the website, application, or software is aligned to curriculum approved for use in schools. The department: (1) may not approve websites, applications, and software that include the capability of student-to-student communication such as chat functions, direct messages, or private messaging; and (2) may approve websites, applications, and software that include email capability, the means for the teacher to communicate directly to an individual student or a group of students, and the means for students to communicate collectively to all students in a course in which they are enrolled. (B) School districts may not issue digital devices for student use: (1) that contain any applications and other software lacking approval required in subsection (A); and (2) unless the device has filters or other means to prevent the access of websites or the downloading of applications or software lacking approval required in subsection (A). (C) Public school students are prohibited from accessing websites, or downloading or installing software or computer applications that are not approved by the department as provided in subsection (A). (D) The department shall develop a procedure through which teachers, administrators, or district-level staff may seek preapproval or approval for the use of specific internet websites, computer applications, and computer software aligned with curriculum pursuant to subsection (A). SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----